Washington statutes.
RCW 18.200.040

Practices not limited by chapter.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to prohibit or restrict:

(1) The practice by individuals listed under RCW 18.130.040 and performing services within their authorized scopes of practice;

(2) The practice by an individual employed by the government of the United States while engaged in the performance of duties prescribed by the laws of the United States;

(3) The practice by a person who is a regular student in an orthotic or prosthetic educational program approved by the secretary, and whose performance of services is pursuant to a regular course of instruction or assignments from an instructor and under the general supervision of the instructor, if the person is designated by a title that clearly indicates the person's status as a student or trainee;

(4) A person fulfilling the supervised residency or internship experience requirements described in RCW 18.200.070, if the activities and services constitute a part of the experience necessary to meet the requirements of this chapter; or

(5) A person from performing orthotic or prosthetic services in this state if: (a) The services are performed for no more than ninety working days; and (b) the person is licensed in another state or has met commonly accepted standards for the practice of orthotics or prosthetics as determined by the secretary.

[ 1997 c 285 s 5.]